Utah statutes.
53A-6-107.    Program approval.

(1)  The board shall establish by rule the standards which must be met by approved preparation programs and alternative preparation programs.

(2)  Standards adopted by the board for approved preparation programs and alternative preparation programs shall meet or exceed generally recognized national standards for preparation of educators, such as those developed by the Interstate New Teacher Assessment and Support Consortium, the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards, and the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

